lexc/verb/enhuigebik.lexc
LEXICON Casemely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§igeamely§n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§igeamely§n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§igeamely§ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§igeamely§n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§igeamely§n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igeamely§ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igeamely§ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^§igeamely§ni  #;
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeomely§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§igeamely§sz         #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^ik           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeumely§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§igeomely§t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^§igeamely§n§igeamely§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeomely§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeomely§d        #;    ! ed/od
!+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1mely§       #;    ! i/sa
!+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeumely§k       #;    ! jük/suk
!+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1mely§ #;    ! itek/sátok
!+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1mely§     #;    ! ik/sák
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^§igeomely§tt§AAmely§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^§igeomely§tt§igeaamely§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igeomely§tt      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^§igeomely§tt§igeumely§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^§igeomely§tt§igeamely§t§igeo2mely§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^§igeomely§tt§igeamely§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^§igeomely§tt§igeamely§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^§igeomely§tt§igeamely§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^§igeomely§tt§igeamely§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^§igeomely§tt§igeumely§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^§igeomely§tt§igeaamely§t§igeo2mely§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^§igeomely§tt§igeaamely§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^§igeamely§nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^§igeamely§n§igeaamely§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^§igeamely§n§igeamely§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§igeamely§n§igeaamely§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§igeamely§n§igeoomely§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^§igeamely§n§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^§igeamely§n§igeaamely§n§igeamely§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^§igeamely§n§igeaamely§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^§igeamely§n§igeaamely§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^§igeamely§n§igeaamely§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^§igeamely§n§igeaamely§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^§igeamely§n§igeaamely§t§igeomely§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^§igeamely§n§igeaamely§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
!+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igeamely§k           #;    !
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^§igeomely§tt§igeamely§l§igeamely§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^§igeamely§n§igeaamely§l§igeamely§k                  #;    ! ná/né

!sikol
LEXICON AddVerbmely3
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Repmely3;

LEXICON Repmely3
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§felteomely§g§AAmely§t  Impermely3;
                    Imper1mely3;

LEXICON Impermely3
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AAmely§t  Nrepmely3;
                      Nrepmely5;
LEXICON Imper1mely3
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt§§AAmely§t  Nrepmely3;
                      Nrep1mely3;

LEXICON Nrepmely3
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AAmely§t  NImpermely3;
                      NImpermely5;
LEXICON Nrepmely5
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AAmely§t  NImpermely3;
                      NImpermely5;

LEXICON Nrep1mely3
+Rep:^+cNrep^§felteomely§g§AAmely§t  NImpermely3;
                      NImper1mely3;

LEXICON NImpermely3
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AAmely§t  Potmely3;
                      Potmely5;
LEXICON NImpermely5
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AAmely§t  Potmely3;
                      Potmely5;

LEXICON NImper1mely3
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt§§AAmely§t  Potmely3;
                      Pot1mely3;

LEXICON Potmely3
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAAmely§t  AddInfmely3;
             Casemely3;
LEXICON Potmely5
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAAmely§t  AddInfmely3;
             Casemely3;
LEXICON Pot1mely3
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAAmely§t  AddInfmely3;
             Case1mely4;
LEXICON AddInfmely3
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
               Casemely3;

LEXICON Verb
siklik:sikol AddVerbmely3;
